Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB380.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "eligible entity" in section 102 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, amended July 15, 2024 (P.L.700, No.57), is amended to read:Section 102. Definitions.--The following words or phrases, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 * * *"Eligible entity" [shall mean a city of the third class, a hospital, a church, a synagogue, a volunteer fire company, a volunteer ambulance company, a volunteer rescue squad, a unit of a nationally chartered club which has been issued a club liquor license, a club which has been issued a club liquor license and which, as of December 31, 2002, has been in existence for at least 100 years, a library, a nationally accredited Pennsylvania nonprofit zoological institution licensed by the United States Department of Agriculture, a nonprofit agricultural association in existence for at least ten years, a bona fide sportsmen's club in existence for at least ten years, a nationally chartered veterans' organization and any affiliated lodge or subdivision of such organization, a fraternal benefit society that is licensed to do business in this Commonwealth and any affiliated lodge or subdivision of such fraternal benefit society, any nationally recognized community-based voluntary health organization committed to fighting cancer, which has been in existence for at least 100 years, a museum operated by a nonprofit corporation, a nonprofit corporation engaged in the performing arts, an arts council, a nonprofit corporation that operates an arts facility or museum, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) whose purpose is to protect the architectural heritage of a municipality and which has been recognized as such by a resolution of the municipality, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) conducting a regatta in a city of the second class with the permit to be used on State park 20250HB0380PN0345 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 grounds or conducting a family-oriented celebration as part of Welcome America in a city of the first class on property leased from that city for more than fifty years, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) whose purpose is to raise funds for the research and treatment of cystic fibrosis, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) whose purpose is to educate the public on issues dealing with watershed conservation, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) whose purpose is to provide equine or canine assisted activities for children and adults with special needs, a nonprofit economic development agency in a city of the second class with the primary function to serve as an economic generator for the greater southwestern Pennsylvania region by attracting and supporting film, television and related media industry projects and coordinating government and business offices in support of a production, a county tourist promotion agency as defined in section 2 of the act of July 4, 2008 (P.L.621, No.50), known as the "Tourism Promotion Act," a junior league that is a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) that is comprised of women whose purpose is exclusively educational and charitable in promoting the volunteerism of women and developing and participating in community projects and that has been in existence for over seventy years, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and whose purpose is the education and promotion of American history, a nonprofit 20250HB0380PN0345 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organization as defined under section 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 whose purpose is to support business and industry, a brewery which has been issued a license to manufacture malt or brewed beverages and has been in existence for at least 100 years or a club recognized by Rotary International and whose purpose is to provide service to others, to promote high ethical standards and to advance world understanding, goodwill and peace through its fellowship of business, professional and community leaders or a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) whose purpose is to promote mushrooms while supporting local and regional charities, a museum operated by a not-for-profit corporation in a city of the second class A, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 which is located in a city of the second class A and has as its purpose economic and community development, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) or (6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 that is located in a city of the third class in a county of the fifth class, a nonprofit social service organization defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 located in a county of the third class whose purpose is to serve individuals and families in that county of the third class, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 whose main purpose is to temporarily foster stray and unwanted animals and match them to suitable permanent homes or a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 who operates either a Main Street Program or Elm Street Program 20250HB0380PN0345 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recognized by the Commonwealth, the National Trust for Historic Preservation or both, a nonprofit radio station that is a member of the National Public Radio network, a nonprofit public television station that is a member of the Pennsylvania Public Television Network or a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 whose purpose is to promote awareness, education and research and to provide a support system for patients with neutropenia and their families through a national resource network, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 whose main purpose is to stimulate community development by facilitating residential and retail growth in a city of the second class located in a county of the second class or a nonprofit community development corporation organized under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 that serves an adjoining borough and township in a county of the second class and whose main purpose is to facilitate commercial development and foster neighborhood stabilization, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 whose purpose is to provide young people with a program to build character, to teach the responsibilities of citizenship and to develop personal fitness with a goal of creating future leaders, a nonprofit as defined in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 whose main purpose is to assist children and their families who are facing financial hardship due to the death of a parent, a nonprofit as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 whose purpose is to allocate funds for research to expedite a cure achromatopsia, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the 20250HB0380PN0345 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Internal Revenue Code of 1986 that is located in a city of the first class, was organized as a community development organization to promote health, safety and welfare of the residents, businesses and institutions of a neighborhood of a city of the first class, and whose works include public promotions, neighborhood improvement projects and commercial corridor improvements, including a business improvement district, or a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 that is responsible for providing services to members of the armed forces of the United States and relief to disaster victims in the United States and abroad, or any neighborhood improvement district management association as defined in section 3 of the act of December 20, 2000 (P.L.949, No.130), known as the "Neighborhood Improvement District Act," that has been established as a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 located in a city of the first class whose purpose is to support initiatives to enrich the lives of children, teens and families especially those in need, to reach their full potential as productive and responsible citizens and has been in existence for at least seventy-five years, or a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 located in a city of the second class and incorporated as a nonprofit in 1982 that offers adult education and family literacy, or a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 located in a city of the third class and county of the sixth class, whose purpose is primary and secondary education 20250HB0380PN0345 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and educational ministry of the Diocese of Erie, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code located in a county of the fourth class that had a population between 142,000 and 144,000 based on the 2010 Decennial Census of the Bureau of the Census and provides rewards for information that leads to the arrest of individuals that may have committed a crime or a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 which is located in a city of the third class in a county of the fifth class whose mission is to improve the quality of life for individuals with developmental disabilities and the families of the individuals through advocacy, education, support and socialization and that has been in existence for over sixty years.] shall mean a city of the third class, a hospital, a church, a synagogue, a volunteer fire company, a volunteer ambulance company, a volunteer rescue squad, a unit of a nationally chartered club which has been issued a club liquor license, a club which has been issued a club liquor license and which, as of December 31, 2002, has been in existence for at least 100 years, a library, a nationally accredited Pennsylvania nonprofit zoological institution licensed by the United States Department of Agriculture, a nonprofit agricultural association in existence for at least ten years, a bona fide sportsmen's club in existence for at least ten years, a nationally chartered veterans' organization and any affiliated lodge or subdivision of such organization, a fraternal benefit society that is licensed to do business in this Commonwealth and any affiliated lodge or subdivision of such fraternal benefit society, any nationally recognized community-based voluntary health organization committed to fighting cancer which has been in 20250HB0380PN0345 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 existence for at least 100 years, a museum operated by a nonprofit corporation, a nonprofit corporation engaged in the performing arts, an arts council, a nonprofit corporation that operates an arts facility or museum, a nonprofit organization as defined under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(6) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) whose purpose is to support business and industry, a nonprofit organization as defined under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) or (6) that is located in a city of the third class in a county of the fifth class, a nonprofit economic development agency in a city of the second class with the primary function to serve as an economic generator for the greater southwestern Pennsylvania region by attracting and supporting film, television and related media industry projects and coordinating government and business offices in support of a production, a county tourism promotion agency as defined in section 2 of the act of July 4, 2008 (P.L.621, No.50), known as the "Tourism Promotion Act," a brewery which has been issued a license to manufacture malt or brewed beverages and has been in existence for at least 100 years, a club recognized by Rotary International and whose purpose is to provide service to others, to promote high ethical standards and to advance world understanding, goodwill and peace through its fellowship of business, professional and community leaders, a museum operated by a nonprofit corporation in a city of the second class A, a nonprofit radio station that is a member of the National Public Radio network, a nonprofit public television station that is a member of the Pennsylvania Public Television Network or a nonprofit organization as defined under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).* * *20250HB0380PN0345 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0380PN0345 - 9 - 1